en: German cheeses, Cheeses from Germany
de: Deutscher Käse
es: Quesos alemanes, Quesos de Alemania
fr: Fromages allemands
hr: Njemački sirevi
lt: Vokiški sūriai

en: Harzer
de: Harzer Käse, Harzer, Harzer Roller

en: Cheeses from Switzerland, Swiss Cheese
bg: Швейцарски сирена
de: Schweizer Käse
es: Quesos de Suiza, Queso Suizo
fi: juustoja Sveitsistä
fr: Fromages de Suisse, Fromages suisses
hr: Sirevi iz Švicarske
it: Formaggi svizzeri
nl: Zwitserse kazen
pl: Sery szwajcarskie, Sery ze Szwajcarii
pt: Queijos da Suíça
ru: Швейцарские сыры

en: Cheeses of the Netherlands, Dutch Cheese
bg: Нидерландски сирена
de: Holländischer Käse, Käse aus Holland
es: Quesos de los Países Bajos
fi: Alankomaalaiset juustot, Hollantilaiset juustot
fr: Fromages des Pays-Bas, Fromages néerlandais, Fromages hollandais
he: גבינות הולנדיות
hr: Nizozemski sirevi
it: Formaggi olandesi
lt: Nyderlandiški sūriai, sūriai iš Olandijos
nl: Nederlandse kazen, Hollandse kazen
pl: Sery niderlandzkie, Sery z Niderlandów, Sery holenderskie
pt: Queijos dos países baixos
ru: Голландские сыры

en: Industrial cheese
de: Industrieller Käse
es: Queso industrial
fi: teollinen juusto
fr: Fromages industriels
hr: Industrijski sir
it: Formaggio industriale
nl: Fabriekskazen, Industriële kazen
pt: Queijo industrial

en: Irish cheeses, cheeses from Ireland
de: Irische Käse, Käse aus Irland
es: Quesos irlandeses, quesos de Irlanda
fr: Fromages irlandais, fromages d'Irlande
hr: Irski sirevi
it: Formaggi irlandesi, formaggi dall'Irlanda
lt: Airiški sūriai
nl: Ierse kazen, kazen uit Ierland
pt: Queijos irlandeses, queijos da Irlanda

en: Italian cheeses, Cheeses from Italy
bg: Италиански сирена
ca: Formatges italians, Formatges d'Itàlia
de: Italienischer Käse, Käse aus Italien
es: Quesos italianos, quesos de Italia
fi: italialaiset juustot
fr: Fromages italiens, Fromages d'Italie
he: גבינות איטלקיות
hr: Talijanski sirevi
hu: Olasz sajtok
it: Formaggi italiani
lt: Itališki sūriai, sūriai iš Italijos
nl: Italiaanse kazen
pl: Sery włoskie, Sery z Włoch
pt: Queijos italianos, Queijos da Italia
ru: Итальянские сыры
sv: Italienska ostar, ostar från Italien
tr: İtalyan peynirleri, İtalya peynirleri
uk: Італійські сири
zh: 意大利奶酪

en: Mascarpone
xx: Mascarpone
bg: Маскарпоне
de: Mascarpone
es: Mascarpone
fi: mascarpone
fr: Mascarpone, mascarpones
hr: Mascarpone
hu: Mascarpone
it: Mascarpone
ja: マスカルポーネ
nl: Mascarpone

en: Stracchino
xx: Stracchino
de: Stracchino
es: Stracchino
fr: Stracchino
it: Stracchino, Crescenza

en: Asiago
xx: Asiago
fr: Asiago
it: Asiago

it: Caciocavallo Silano
bg: Качокавало

it: Canestrato Pugliese
xx: Canestrato Pugliese

en: Fontal
xx: Fontal
fr: Fontal
it: Fontal

en: Fontina, Fontina cheese from cow's milk
xx: Fontina
fr: Fontina
it: Fontina

it: Salva Cremasco
xx: Salva Cremasco

en: Grana Padano
xx: Grana padano
bg: Грана Падано
de: Grana Padano
es: Grana Padano
fi: Grana Padano
fr: Grana Padano
hr: Grana padano
it: Grana Padano
nl: Grana Padano

en: Mozzarella
xx: Mozzarella
bg: Моцарела
de: Mozzarella, Mozzarellas
es: Mozzarella, Queso Mozzarella
fi: mozzarella
fr: Mozzarella
he: מוצרלה
hr: Mozzarella
hu: Mozzarella
it: Mozzarella
ja: モッツァレラ
lt: Mocarela
nl: Mozzarellas
pl: Mozzarella
ru: Моцарелла
sv: Mozzarella

en: Grated Mozzarella
fr: Mozzarella râpée
hr: Ribana mozzarella
nl: Mozzarelas (geraspt)

en: Cow mozzarella
fr: Mozzarella de vache
hr: Kravlja mozzarella
it: Mozzarella di mucca
nl: Koemozzarellas, Koemelkmozzarellas

en: Mozzarellas from Gioia del Colle
it: Mozzarella di Gioia del Colle